Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-113 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Firearm entity” means the same as defined in Section


1289.31 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Seller” means an entity that is registered with the United


States Department of the Treasury as a money transmitter pursuant to


C.F.R., Section 103.41, and that provides an electronic funds


transmission service, including service by telephone and the


Internet; and


3. “Surcharge” means the same as defined in Section 2-211 of


Title 14A of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 3167 Page 1


B. No seller shall impose a surcharge or deny usage to any


consumer who conducts business with a firearm entity.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3167 CAD 1/14/2026 9:45:47 AM







































Req. No. 3167 Page 2